lexc/noun/enhuing.lexc
!!!enhu2.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ 
§uue2§ §AE21§
§UUE2§ §OEOE25§ §UUE21§ §AE22§ §OEOE22§ §oooe2§ §oeoez22§
§AAA2§ §oeoe2§ §AA2§ §oeoez25§  §oeoez17§
§OEOE17§ §EOA17§ §ooez18§ 

      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor


LEXICON AddNouni
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possi;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possi
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;


LEXICON AddNounmely
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possmely;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurmely;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fammely;

LEXICON Possmely
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE17§m   Fammely;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE17§d   Fammely;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fammely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fammely;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE17§t§OEOE25§k   Fammely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fammely;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fammely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fammely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fammely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fammely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fammely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammely;

LEXICON Plurmely
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genmely;
                            Genmely;
        
LEXICON Fammely
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmely;
                       Genmely;

LEXICON Genmely
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Casemely;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemely;
                       Casemely;
 
LEXICON Casemely
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez22§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor


LEXICON AddNounmelyi
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possmelyi;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurmely;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fammely;

LEXICON Possmelyi
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE17§m   Fammely;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE17§d   Fammely;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fammely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fammely;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE17§t§OEOE25§k   Fammely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fammely;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fammely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fammely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fammely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fammely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fammely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^im   Fammely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^id   Fammely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^i   Fammely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^ink   Fammely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^it§OEOE22§k   Fammely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^ik   Fammely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammely;

LEXICON AddNounmelyot
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possmelyot;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurmely;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fammely;

LEXICON Noun
Fabini AddNouni;
Fabini AddNounmelyi;
Fabinyi AddNouni;
Fabinyi AddNounmelyi;
Haiti AddNouni;
Haiti AddNounmelyi;
Lovei AddNouni;
Lovei AddNounmelyi;
Matei AddNouni;
Matei AddNounmelyi;
Nagylucsei AddNouni;
Nagylucsei AddNounmelyi;
Noémi AddNouni;
Noémi AddNounmelyi;
Paganini AddNouni;
Paganini AddNounmelyi;
Paulini AddNouni;
Paulini AddNounmelyi;
Paulinyi AddNouni;
Paulinyi AddNounmelyi;
Puccini AddNouni;
Puccini AddNounmelyi;
Requinyi AddNouni;
Requinyi AddNounmelyi;
Rossini AddNouni;
Rossini AddNounmelyi;
Schopenhauer AddNoun;
Tahiti AddNouni;
Tahiti AddNounmelyi;
adapter AddNounmely;
adatproducer AddNoun;
alappanel AddNoun;
alibi AddNouni;
alibi AddNounmelyi;
amidazofén AddNounmely;
antitestpanel AddNoun;
aranyifi AddNouni;
aranyifi AddNounmelyi;
athéni AddNouni;
athéni AddNounmelyi;
autókábel AddNoun;
azeri AddNouni;
azeri AddNounmelyi;
bankpartner AddNounmely;
bekötőkábel AddNoun;
billentyűpuffer AddNoun;
boltszoftver AddNounmely;
bronzkandeláber AddNoun;
bébipartedli AddNouni;
bébipartedli AddNounmelyi;
búvárkomputer AddNounmely;
bőrstanicli AddNouni;
bőrstanicli AddNounmelyi;
bővítőpanel AddNoun;
csatárifi AddNouni;
csatárifi AddNounmelyi;
cserkészifi AddNouni;
cserkészifi AddNounmelyi;
csodaifi AddNouni;
csodaifi AddNounmelyi;
csodakolibri AddNouni;
csodakolibri AddNounmelyi;
csoportkarakter AddNounmely;
csúcskráter AddNoun;
cukkini AddNouni;
cukkini AddNounmelyi;
dugómotel AddNounmely;
ebédpartner AddNoun;
emberkolibri AddNouni;
emberkolibri AddNounmelyi;
exponens AddNounmely;
fahokedli AddNouni;
fahokedli AddNounmelyi;
faházpanel AddNoun;
fakolibri AddNouni;
fakolibri AddNounmelyi;
fenomén AddNounmely;
filmhamburger AddNoun;
formamidin AddNounmely;
fotóproducer AddNoun;
földelőkábel AddNounmely;
fürtszoftver AddNoun;
galeri AddNouni;
galeri AddNounmelyi;
guanidin AddNounmely;
gyapotkolibri AddNouni;
gyapotkolibri AddNounmelyi;
gyerekaszpirin AddNoun;
gólyaláger AddNounmely;
hajócharter AddNoun;
harakiri AddNouni;
harakiri AddNounmelyi;
herkópáter AddNounmely;
holocén AddNoun;
ifi AddNouni;
ifi AddNounmelyi;
ikerkráter AddNounmely;
indexelőszoftver AddNoun;
jogszabálydzsungel AddNounmely;
jéghotel AddNoun;
karbonátpuffer AddNounmely;
kazein AddNoun;
kitöltőkarakter AddNounmely;
klónkarakter AddNoun;
koleszgaleri AddNouni;
koleszgaleri AddNounmelyi;
konyhahokedli AddNouni;
konyhahokedli AddNounmelyi;
koronén AddNounmely;
kukoricaadapter AddNoun;
kábelspagetti AddNouni;
kábelspagetti AddNounmelyi;
képzettségszoftver AddNounmely;
kódkarakter AddNoun;
labdarúgópartner AddNounmely;
lemezproducer AddNoun;
lápkataszter AddNounmely;
macskaposzter AddNoun;
merengőpartner AddNounmely;
milliamper AddNoun;
motorpartner AddNounmely;
munkaláger AddNoun;
nagyfotel AddNounmely;
nemzetkarakter AddNoun;
nokedli AddNouni;
nokedli AddNounmelyi;
oktaéder AddNounmely;
operettfenomén AddNoun;
papundekli AddNouni;
papundekli AddNounmelyi;
parazitakráter AddNounmely;
partedli AddNouni;
partedli AddNounmelyi;
pernahajder AddNoun;
postabróker AddNounmely;
programozószoftver AddNoun;
rajzfilmsláger AddNounmely;
reklámproducer AddNoun;
roráté AddNounmely;
részvényvolumen AddNoun;
sláger AddNounmely;
spagetti AddNouni;
spagetti AddNounmelyi;
spejz AddNounmelyot;
sportpulóver AddNoun;
stanicli AddNouni;
stanicli AddNounmelyi;
szemhéjpúder AddNounmely;
szereppartner AddNoun;
szolárbojler AddNounmely;
sztárifi AddNouni;
sztárifi AddNounmelyi;
szállodapartner AddNoun;
szűrőpanel AddNounmely;
sóder AddNoun;
teleobjektív AddNounmely;
teniszpartner AddNoun;
topázkolibri AddNouni;
topázkolibri AddNounmelyi;
transzputer AddNounmely;
tucatsláger AddNoun;
társrekorder AddNounmely;
tévéfotel AddNoun;
uridin AddNounmely;
vadászkolibri AddNouni;
vadászkolibri AddNounmelyi;
vagyonkataszter AddNoun;
vapiti AddNouni;
vapiti AddNounmelyi;
vezérkarakter AddNounmely;
világhotel AddNoun;
vígjátékkarakter AddNounmely;
zenegrófné AddNoun;
zsírnokedli AddNouni;
zsírnokedli AddNounmelyi;
átalakítószoftver AddNounmely;
építőpanel AddNoun;
ükfater AddNounmely;
üzletpartner AddNoun;
Boriszné AddNounmely;
Gyuláné AddNounmely;
Teofilné AddNounmely;
